Illinois, session 104th, HB1064.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Community Mental Health Act is amended by 5changing Sections 1, 2, 3, 3a, and 8 as follows: 6    (405 ILCS 20/1)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 301)7    Sec. 1. As used in this Act: 8    "Direct recipient services" means only those services 9required to carry out a completed individualized treatment 10plan that is signed by a service recipient or legal guardian. 11Crisis assessment and stabilization services are excluded, 12although these services may be anticipated in a treatment 13plan. 14    "Governmental unit" means any public library district, 15county, city, village, incorporated town, or township.16    "Person with a developmental disability" means any person 17or persons so diagnosed and as defined in the Mental Health and 18Developmental Disabilities Code. Community mental health 19boards operating under this Act may in their jurisdiction, by 20a majority vote, add to the definition of "person with a 21developmental disability".22    "Mental illness" has the meaning ascribed to that term in 23the Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities Code.   HB1064- 2 -LRB104 05883 KTG 15914 b1Community mental health boards operating under this Act may in 2their jurisdiction, by a majority vote, add to the definition 3of "mental illness". 4    "Substance use disorder" encompasses substance abuse, 5dependence, and addiction, not inconsistent with federal or 6State definitions. 7(Source: P.A. 97-813, eff. 7-13-12.) 8    (405 ILCS 20/2)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 302)9    Sec. 2. Any public library district, county, city, 10village, incorporated town, township, public health district, 11county health department, multiple-county health department, 12school district or any combination thereof, in consultation 13with and being advised by the Department of Human Services, 14shall have the power to construct, repair, operate, maintain 15and regulate community mental health facilities to provide 16mental health services as defined by the local community 17mental health board, including services for, persons with a 18developmental disability or substance use disorder, for 19residents thereof and/or to contract therefor with any private 20or public entity which provides such facilities and services, 21either in or without such county, city, village, incorporated 22town, township, public health district, county health 23department, multiple-county health department, school district 24or any combination thereof.25(Source: P.A. 95-336, eff. 8-21-07.)   HB1064- 3 -LRB104 05883 KTG 15914 b1    (405 ILCS 20/3)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 303)2    Sec. 3. Any such public library district, county, city, 3village, incorporated town, township, public health district, 4county health department, multiple-county health department, 5school district, community mental health board or any 6combination thereof, may accept donations of property and 7funds for the purposes specified in this Act.8(Source: P.A. 81-898.) 9    (405 ILCS 20/3a)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 303a)10    Sec. 3a. Every governmental unit authorized to levy an 11annual tax under any of the provisions of this Act shall, 12before it may levy such tax, establish a 7 member community 13mental health board who shall administer this Act. Such board 14shall be appointed by the president of the public library 15district's board of trustees, the chairman of the governing 16body of a county, the mayor of a city, the president of a 17village, the president of an incorporated town, or the 18supervisor of a township, as the case may be, with the advice 19and consent of the governing body of such public library 20district, county, city, village, incorporated town or the town 21board of trustees of any township, except in any county with a 22county executive form of government, if applicable, the county 23executive shall appoint the board with the advice and consent 24of the county board. Members of the community mental health   HB1064- 4 -LRB104 05883 KTG 15914 b1board shall be residents of the government unit and, as nearly 2as possible, be representative of interested groups of the 3community such as local health departments, local 4comprehensive health planning agencies, hospital boards, lay 5associations concerned with mental health, developmental 6disabilities and substance abuse, and individuals with 7professional or lived expertise in mental health, 8developmental disabilities, and substance abuse. General 9public representation may also be considered for appointment 10when there are gaps in board duties and qualifications that 11cannot be filled from the above stated categories. Only one 12member shall be a member of the governing body, with the term 13of membership on the board to run concurrently with the 14elected term of the member. The chairman of the governing body 15may, upon the request of the community mental health board, 16appoint 2 additional members to the community mental health 17board. No member of the community mental health board may be a 18full-time or part-time employee of the Department of Human 19Services or a board member, employee or any other individual 20receiving compensation from any facility or service operating 21under contract to the board. If a successful referendum is 22held under Section 5 of this Act, all members of such board 23shall be appointed within 60 days after the local election 24authority certifies the passage of the referendum. If a 25community mental health board has been established by a county 26with a population of less than 500,000 and the community   HB1064- 5 -LRB104 05883 KTG 15914 b1mental health board is funded in whole or in part by a special 2mental health sales tax described in paragraph (4) of 3subsection (a) of Section 5-1006.5 of the Counties Code, the 4largest municipality in the county with at least 125,000 5residents may appoint 2 additional members to the board. The 6members shall be appointed by the mayor of the municipality 7with the advice and consent of the municipality's governing 8body.9    Home rule units are exempt from this Act. However, they 10may, by ordinance, adopt the provisions of this Act, or any 11portion thereof, that they may deem advisable.12    The tax rate set forth in Section 4 may be levied by any 13non-home rule unit only pursuant to the approval by the voters 14at a referendum. Such referendum may have been held at any time 15subsequent to the effective date of the Community Mental 16Health Act.17(Source: P.A. 103-274, eff. 1-1-24; 103-565, eff. 11-17-23; 18103-592, eff. 6-7-24.) 19    (405 ILCS 20/8)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 308)20    Sec. 8. The Secretary of Human Services may make 21grants-in-aid to such public library district, county, city, 22village, incorporated town, township, public health district, 23county health department, multiple-county health department, 24school district or any combination thereof in accordance with 25the provisions of Section 34 of the Mental Health and   HB1064- 6 -LRB104 05883 KTG 15914 b1Developmental Disabilities Administrative Act. However, no 2such grants shall be made without first considering the review 3and comments made by the board as set forth in Section 3e and 4responding thereto. The Department shall make all rules 5necessary for carrying out the provisions of this Section, 6including the setting of standards of eligibility for state 7assistance.8(Source: P.A. 91-357, eff. 7-29-99.)